New York, session 2025-2026, S836.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Short title. This act shall be known and referred to as the 2 "migrant home rule transfer and transparency act". 3 § 2. Notwithstanding any provisions of law, rule or regulation to the 4 contrary, no municipality shall relocate migrants from such municipality 5 for the purpose of permanent or temporary housing to another munici- 6 pality in New York unless and until a resolution authorizing the relo- 7 cation has been adopted by the governing bodies of both the receiving 8 municipality and the county in which the receiving municipality is 9 located. Prior to the actual physical relocation of the migrants, the 10 relocating municipality shall provide at least thirty days written 11 notice to the receiving municipality of the impending relocation of such 12 individuals. 13 § 3. As used in this act: 14 (i) "municipality" means a city, town, village or hamlet in New York 15 state; 16 (ii) "receiving municipality" means the municipality to which the 17 migrants are to be transported; and 18 (iii) "relocating municipality" means the municipality in which the 19 migrants are currently housed and from which the migrants are to be 20 relocated. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02784-01-5 S. 836 2 1 § 4. A violation of the provisions of this act shall be punishable by 2 a fine in the amount of $1,000 per migrant, per day, payable to the 3 comptroller of the state of New York. 4 § 5. This act shall take effect immediately.